Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 5A. State Facilities Security

§ 171.
Responsibility for security.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall be responsible for ensuring the security of all State facilities, regardless of funding source for construction or renovation, the lands upon which those facilities are located, and the occupants of those facilities and places, except that:

in those State-owned or State-leased buildings that house a court plus one or more other functions, security for the space occupied by the court shall be under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and security elsewhere shall be under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services;

in those buildings which function exclusively as courthouses, security shall be under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court;

the space occupied by the Supreme Court shall be under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court; and

in the State House, security shall be under the jurisdiction of the Sergeant at Arms.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall develop a security plan for each facility, except for those under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and of the Sergeant at Arms, and shall regularly update these plans as necessary and be responsible for coordinating responses to all security needs. The Supreme Court and the Sergeant at Arms shall, in cooperation with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, prepare and update such plans for the facilities under their respective jurisdictions.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may delegate the responsibility for security at specified facilities.

All security improvements to State facilities shall be under the direction of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, who shall set statewide standards for policies, materials, and equipment, including voice and data reception and transmission upgrades and installations.

Under this section, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services is responsible for the protection of State facilities, the lands upon which the facilities are situated, and the occupants of those facilities, which is vital to sustaining the essential services of government in an emergency. The Commissioner shall develop plans for continuity of government and continuity of operations as an addendum to the State emergency operations plan maintained by the Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management and referenced in

20 V.S.A. § 8(b)(2)

.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, the Sergeant at Arms, and the Court Administrator shall execute a memorandum of understanding to coordinate the provision of security plans and law enforcement services within the Capitol Complex. The memorandum of understanding shall incorporate any existing agreements related to the provision of law enforcement services or security in the Capitol Complex. As used in this section, “Capitol Complex” has the same meaning as used in section 182 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 29

, § 44, eff. May 19, 1999; amended

2001, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 27, 2002;

2015, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 6, 2016.

§ 172.
Capitol Complex security.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall be responsible for all security operations pertaining to the lands and structures within the Capitol Complex, except the interior of the State House and the space occupied by the Supreme Court, which is provided for in section 171 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 29

, § 44, eff. May 19, 1999; amended

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. May 14, 2012.